local/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.sv.dix
    <pardef n="vis/um__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ums</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>umets</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>umet</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ums</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="l/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>össens</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>össen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öss</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>öss</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usens</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Schweiz__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Afrika__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="arton__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="all/__prn">
       <e>
	<p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
	</p>
       </e>	  
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="var/s__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sin</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sina</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sitt</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tannat</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tdera</l>
          <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ing/en__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="vilk/en__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="an/nan__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nan</l>
          <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nat</l>
          <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dra</l>
          <r>nan<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ea"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
    
    
    
    <pardef n="jag__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="du__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="di/n__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ea"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="ut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tt</l>
          <r>n<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="dig__prn"> 
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/an__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onom</l>
          <r>an<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="hans__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="h/on__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enne</l>
          <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      </pardef>
      
      <pardef n="hennes__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vi__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ni__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="allt"><i>allt</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alla"><i>alla</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="alle"><i>alle</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="allihop"><i>allihop</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="allting"><i>allting</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="annan"><i>an</i><par n="an/nan__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="båda"><i>båda</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="dig"><i>dig</i><par n="dig__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="din"><i>di</i><par n="di/n__det"/></e>
    <e lm="dessa"><i>dessa</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="du"><i>du</i><par n="du__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="envar"><i>envar</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="han"><i>h</i><par n="h/an__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="hans"><i>hans</i><par n="hans__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hennes"><i>hennes</i><par n="hennes__det"/></e>
    <e lm="hon"><i>h</i><par n="h/on__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ingen"><i>ing</i><par n="ing/en__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ingenting"><i>ingenting</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="jag"><i>jag</i><par n="jag__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><i>man</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="många"><i>många</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ni"><i>ni</i><par n="ni__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sådan"><i>sådan</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sådana"><i>sådana</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="sådant"><i>sådant</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="varandra"><i>varandra</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="varann"><i>varann</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vardera"><i>vardera</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="varje"><i>varje</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vars"><i>var</i><par n="var/s__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vartdera"><i>vartdera</i><par n="all/__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vi"><i>vi</i><par n="vi__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="vilken"><i>vilk</i><par n="vilk/en__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="lus"><i>l</i><par n="l/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="visum"><i>vis</i><par n="vis/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Armenien"><i>Armenien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Asien"><i>Asien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Australien"><i>Australien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Belgien"><i>Belgien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgarien"><i>Bulgarien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Danmark"><i>Danmark</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="England"><i>England</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Estland"><i>Estland</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Europa"><i>Europa</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Finland"><i>Finland</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Grekland"><i>Grekland</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Indien"><i>Indien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Island"><i>Island</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lettland"><i>Lettland</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Polen"><i>Polen</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Schweiz"><i>Schweiz</i><par n="Schweiz__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Skandinavien"><i>Skandinavien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Spanien"><i>Spanien</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Turkiet"><i>Turkiet</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="USA"><i>USA</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ungern"><i>Ungern</i><par n="Afrika__np"/></e>
    <e lm="artonde"><i>artonde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="elva"><i>elva</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fem"><i>fem</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="femtionde"><i>femtionde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="femtonde"><i>femtonde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fjortonde"><i>fjortonde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="fyrtio"><i>fyrtio</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="hundrade"><i>hundrade</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nittio"><i>nittio</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nitton"><i>nitton</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="noll"><i>noll</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sextio"><i>sextio</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sexton"><i>sexton</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sju"><i>sju</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sjuttionde"><i>sjuttionde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sjuttonde"><i>sjuttonde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="tolv"><i>tolv</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trettio"><i>trettio</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trettonde"><i>trettonde</i><par n="arton__num"/></e>
